src/fst/morphology/affixes/pronouns.lexc
!! Pronoun inflection
! ----------------------
!! The Lushootseed language pronouns inflect in the same cases as regular
!! nouns, but with a colon (':') as separator.

LEXICON PRON-PERS-SG1
+Pers+Sg1:   #  ;

LEXICON PRON-PERS-SG2
+Pers+Sg2:   #  ;

LEXICON PRON-PERS-SG3
+Pers+Sg3:   #  ;

LEXICON	PRON-PERS-PL1
+Pers+Pl1:   #  ;

LEXICON PRON-PERS-PL2
+Pers+Pl2:   #  ;

LEXICON PRON-PERS-PL3
+Pers+Pl3:   #  ;

LEXICON PRON_INTERR
+Interr: K ;

LEXICON PRON_DEM
+Dem: K ;

LEXICON PRON_DEM_MSC
+Dem+Msc: K ;
LEXICON PRON_DEM_MSC_PROX
+Dem+Msc+Prox: K ;
LEXICON PRON_DEM_MSC_DIST
+Dem+Msc+Dist: K ;
LEXICON PRON_DEM_MSC_REM
+Dem+Msc+Rem: K ;

LEXICON PRON_DEM_FEM
+Dem+Fem: K ;
LEXICON PRON_DEM_FEM_PROX
+Dem+Fem+Prox: K ;
LEXICON PRON_DEM_FEM_DIST
+Dem+Fem+Dist: K ;
LEXICON PRON_DEM_FEM_REM
+Dem+Fem+Rem: K ;

! vim: set ft=xfst-lexc:
